Utah statutes.
53A-11-1001.   Notification by juvenile court and law enforcement agencies.

(1)  Notifications received from the juvenile court or law enforcement agencies by the school district pursuant to Subsections 78A-6-112(3)(b) and 78A-6-117(1)(b) are governed by this part.

(2)  School districts may enter into agreements with law enforcement agencies for notification under Subsection (1).



Amended by Chapter 3, 2008 General Session

